Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.049

Modification of construction standards.

The department by rule shall adopt procedures to permit a well operator to modify construction standards to meet unforeseen circumstances encountered during the construction of a well. The procedures shall be developed in consultation with the technical advisory group established in RCW 18.104.190.

[ 1993 c 387 s 7.]